nb: Glidelåsside: Midten; Dobbel; Venstre; Høyre; Annet
pt-BR: Zíper lado: Centro; Duplo; Esquerda; Direita; Outros
vi: Khóa kéo bên hông: Giữa; Kép; Trái; Phải; Khác
tr: Fermuar tarafı: Orta; Çift; Sol; Sağ; Diğer
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko pusė: Centras; Dvigubas; Kairė; Dešinė; Kita
da: Lynlåsside: Midte; Dobbelt; Venstre; Højre; Andet
zh-TW: 拉鍊側: 中間; 雙側; 左側; 右側; 其他
sv: Dragkedjans sida: Mitten; Dubbel; Vänster; Höger; Övrigt
sk-SK: Zips na boku: V strede; Dvojitý; Vľavo; Vpravo; Iné
el: Πλευρά τοποθέτησης φερμουάρ: Κέντρο; Διπλό; Αριστερά; Δεξιά; Άλλο
nl: Ritssluiting: Midden; Dubbel; Links; Rechts; Overig
pt-PT: Lado do fecho de correr: Centro; Duplo; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
ru: Сторона молнии: По центру; Двойная; Слева; Справа; Другая
fi: Vetoketjun puoli: Keskellä; Molemmat; Vasen; Oikea; Muu
ro-RO: Partea fermoarului: Centru; Dublu; Stânga; Dreapta; Altele
cs: Strana zipu: Střed; Dvojitý; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Jiné
sl-SI: Stran zadrge: Sredina; Dvojno; Levo; Desno; Drugo
zh-CN: 拉链侧: 居中; 双侧; 左侧; 右侧; 其他
th: ซิปด้านข้าง: ตรงกลาง; คู่; ซ้าย; ขวา; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Страна на ципа: Център; Двоен; Ляво; Дясно; Други
de: Seite des Reißverschlusses: Mitte; Zweifach; Links; Rechts; Sonstige
pl: Strona zamka błyskawicznego: Środek; Podwójny; Lewa strona; Prawa strona; Inne
ko: 지퍼 위치: 중앙; 듀얼; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 기타
es: Lado de la cremallera: Centro; Doble; Izquierda; Derecha; Otro
it: Lato della cerniera: Centro; Doppio; Sinistra; Destra; Altro
ja: ファスナー付きサイド: センター; デュアル; 左; 右; その他
hu: Cipzár oldala: Közép; Dupla; Bal; Jobb; Egyéb
en: Zipper side: Center; Dual; Left; Right; Other
hr-HR: Strana s patentnim zatvaračem: Sredina; Dvostruki; Lijevo; Desno; Ostalo
fr: Côté de la fermeture éclair: Centre; Double; Gauche; Droite; Autre